Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1752
Seller; noncompliance with act; contract; voidable; purchaser; remedies.

If (1) a seller uses any untrue or misleading statements relating to a seller-assisted marketing plan, (2) a seller fails to provide the disclosure documents or disclose any of the information required by sections 59-1732 to 59-1740, or (3) the contract does not comply with the requirements of the Seller-Assisted Marketing Plan Act, then within one year of the date of the contract at the election of the purchaser upon written notice to the seller, the contract shall be voidable by the purchaser and unenforceable by the seller or his or her assignee as contrary to public policy and the purchaser shall be entitled to receive from the seller all sums paid to the seller when the purchaser is able to return all equipment, supplies, or products delivered by the seller. When such complete return cannot be made, the purchaser shall be entitled to receive from the seller all sums paid to the seller less the fair market value at the time of delivery of the equipment, supplies, or products not returned by the purchaser, but delivered by the seller. Upon the receipt of such sums, the purchaser shall make available to the seller, at the purchaser's address or at the places at which they are located at the time the purchaser gives notice pursuant to this section, the products, equipment, or supplies received by the purchaser from the seller.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 52;

Laws 1993, LB 218, § 20.